Utah statutes.
79-4-601.   "This is the Place Monument," Camp Floyd, old statehouse --
Supervision and control.
(1)  The division shall administer and supervise the following historical
monuments:
(a)  "This is the Place Monument" site;
(b)  Camp Floyd; and
(c)  the old statehouse at Fillmore.
(2)  The division may make expenditures for maintenance and administration
from funds:
(a)  made available by appropriation; or
(b)  that are available to the division.
